Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5626XC (2) 91 ss/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 147.74, subsection 17, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 17. A person who qualifies for licensure as a physician 3 assistant licensed associate under chapter 148C may use the 4 words âphysician assistant associate â after the personâs name 5 or signify the same by the use of the letters âP. A.â after the 6 personâs name. 7 Sec. 2. PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT TITLE CHANGE. 8 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 9 all references in the Iowa Code and Iowa Administrative 10 Code to âphysician assistantâ shall be revised to âphysician 11 associateâ. The terms âphysician assistantâ, âphysician 12 associateâ, and âP.A.â are synonymous, and all rights and 13 responsibilities of a physician assistant under current law are 14 unaffected by the change in title to âphysician associateâ. 15 2. All persons or entities employing, coordinating 16 treatment with, following orders from, training, educating, or 17 contracting with a person licensed as a physician assistant 18 or educating individuals in an accredited physician assistant 19 or physician associate education program, including but not 20 limited to a hospital or other health care facility, physician, 21 third-party payor, the federal government, and malpractice 22 insurance carriers, shall continue the relationship without 23 interruption or alteration as a result of the change in 24 title to âphysician associateâ. A person or entity shall not 25 discriminate against an individual in contracting with the 26 individual, employment, or otherwise solely as a result of the 27 individualâs use of the title âphysician associateâ. 28 3. During the time before the title âphysician associateâ 29 enters common usage, a person eligible for licensure under 30 chapter 148C may use the title âphysician assistantâ, 31 âphysician associateâ, or âP.A.â. A person or entity 32 interacting with a person using the title âphysician associateâ 33 is entitled to rely on the person having all rights and 34 responsibilities of a physician assistant. 35 -1- LSB 5626XC (2) 91 ss/ko 1/ 3 S.F. _____ 4. The change in title from âphysician assistantâ to 1 âphysician associateâ does not expand or alter the scope of 2 practice of a person licensed under chapter 148C. 3 5. Not later than January 1, 2027, each agency shall, as 4 soon as practicable and in the most cost-efficient manner 5 possible, make amendments to active versions of sub-regulatory 6 guidance, documents, and forms to reflect the change in title 7 from âphysician assistantâ to âphysician associateâ. 8 Sec. 3. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE ââ TERMINOLOGY CHANGES. 9 1. The Code editor is directed to change all references 10 to âphysician assistantâ and its derivatives to âphysician 11 associateâ and its derivatives, as appropriate, wherever they 12 appear in the Code, including in sections 90A.1, 90A.8, 96.5, 13 124E.2, 135.1, 135.17, 135.24, 135.39D, 135.105D, 135.146, 14 135.190A, 135.194, 135B.1, 135B.7, 135G.1, 135G.3, 135H.3, 15 135J.1, 135P.1, 136A.2, 136C.3, 137.105, 139A.2, 139A.8, 16 139A.22, 139A.35, 139A.41, 141A.1, 141A.5, 141A.6, 141A.7, 17 142C.8, 144.26, 144.28, 144A.2, 144A.4, 144A.7A, 144B.1, 18 144B.5, 144B.6, 144D.1, 144D.2, 144D.3, 144D.4, 144F.2, 147.1, 19 147.2, 147.13, 147.14, 147.77, 147.107, 147.136, 147.136A, 20 147.138, 147A.1, 147A.8, 147A.9, 147A.10, 147A.13, 148C.1, 21 148C.2, 148C.3, 148C.4, 148C.5, 148C.8, 148C.9, 148C.11, 22 148C.13, 148F.7, 148G.1, 148H.4, 152.1, 152B.1, 152C.9, 152D.4, 23 152D.7, 154C.7, 154D.4, 154F.2, 155A.3, 155A.23, 189A.6, 225.9, 24 225.12, 225.15, 225.16, 228.1, 229.22, 232.68, 232.71B, 232.78, 25 232.79, 232.95, 233.1, 234.22, 235A.13, 237A.5, 237A.13, 249.3, 26 249A.4, 249A.4B, 249N.2, 252E.1, 256.222, 272C.1, 272C.2C, 27 280.13C, 280.16, 280A.1, 321.34, 321.186, 321.375, 321.446, 28 321J.7, 321J.11, 321L.2, 321L.2A, 411.5, 462A.14A, 489.1101, 29 489.1102, 489.1105, 496C.2, 496C.4, 496C.7, 514C.11, 514C.17, 30 514C.18, 514C.20, 514C.25, 514C.28, 514F.6, 614.1, 622.10, 31 668A.1, 669.2, 702.8, 707A.1, 730.5, and 915.46. 32 2. The Code editor is directed to make changes in any Code 33 sections or other noncodified enactments amended or enacted 34 by any other Act to correspond with the changes made in this 35 -2- LSB 5626XC (2) 91 ss/ko 2/ 3 S.F. _____ Act if there appears to be no doubt as to the proper method of 1 making the changes and the changes would not be contrary to or 2 inconsistent with the purposes of this Act or any other Act. 3 Sec. 4. AMENDMENTS TO ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 17A to the contrary, 5 an agency may submit amendments to administrative rules in 6 accordance with this Act to the administrative code editor to 7 be updated editorially. Such amendments shall be limited to 8 updating the term âphysician assistantâ and its derivatives to 9 âphysician associateâ and corresponding derivatives. 10